Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1468.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 41, chapter 7, article 10, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 41-1275, to read: START_STATUTE41-1275. Annual income tax rate review; report On or before November 1 of each year, the joint legislative budget committee staff shall submit a report to the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives reviewing and categorizing, based on the individual income tax rate brackets prescribed by section 43-1011 for the 2022 taxable year, the following information: 1. The individual income tax rate prescribed by section 43-1011. 2. The adjustments to Arizona gross income made by taxpayers pursuant to title 43, chapter 10, article 3 for the prior taxable year. 3. The deductions and credits taken by taxpayers pursuant to title 43, chapter 10, articles 4 and 5 for the prior taxable year. END_STATUTE